Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-445
Plan of reorganization; state committee; disapproval; effect.

If the state committee disapproves the plan, it shall be considered a disapproved plan, shall be returned to the school districts as a disapproved plan, and shall not be submitted to a special election.

Laws 1949, c. 249, § 14, p. 678;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-426.14;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 194;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 20;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 48.

This section provides that county committee may accept or reject recommendations of state committee. Arends v. Whitten, 172 Neb. 297, 109 N.W.2d 363 (1961).

Special election may be held at any convenient place in proposed district. School District No. 49 of Lincoln County v. School District No. 65-R of Lincoln County, 159 Neb. 262, 66 N.W.2d 561 (1954).